Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3201.5] Definitions. As
used in this subpart, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Commission" means the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

"Hawaii commission" means the Hawaii
western interstate commission for higher education established under section
304A-3201.6.

"Hawaii commissioners" means the
members of the Hawaii western interstate commission for higher education. [L
2012, c 137, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next